Utah statutes.
20A-15-202.   Certificate of ratification.

(1)  If the convention agrees, by vote of a majority of the total number of delegates, to ratify the proposed amendment, the president and secretary of the convention shall:

(a)  prepare and sign a certificate to that effect; and

(b)  transmit it to the lieutenant governor.

(2)  Upon receipt of a ratification certificate, the lieutenant governor shall transmit the certificate under the great seal of the state to the Secretary of State of the United States.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

